New York, session 2025-2026, A10771.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 23 of the town law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 38 to read as follows: 3 38. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 4 in the town of Bethany, in the county of Genesee, the person performing 5 the function of town clerk, need not be an elector of such town. 6 Provided, however, the person performing the function of town clerk in 7 any other town shall be an elector of such town, unless otherwise 8 provided by an act of the state legislature. 9 § 2. Section 3 of the public officers law is amended by adding a new 10 subdivision 77 to read as follows: 11 77. In the town of Bethany, in the county of Genesee, the provisions 12 of this section requiring a person to be a resident of the political 13 subdivision or municipal corporation of the state for which such person 14 shall be chosen or within which such person's official functions are 15 required to be exercised, shall not prevent a person from holding the 16 office of town clerk of the town of Bethany, provided that such person 17 resides in an adjoining town or village in the county in which such town 18 is located. Provided, however, the person performing the functions of 19 town clerk in any other town shall be a resident of such town, unless 20 otherwise provided by law. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15293-01-6